North Carolina, session 2025, SB565.
General Assembly of North Carolina enacts:
SECTION 1. There is appropriated from the General Fund to the Office of State
Budget and Management the sum of one hundred fifty thousand dollars ($150,000) in recurring
funds for each year of the 2025-2027 fiscal biennium to provide a directed grant to the Town of
Pinetops to support the staffing needs of the Town's police department.
SECTION 2. There is appropriated from the General Fund to the Office of State
Budget and Management sum of one hundred thousand dollars ($100,000) in nonrecurring funds
for the 2025-2026 fiscal year to provide a directed grant to the Town of Pinetops for equipment
needs of the Town's Police Department.
SECTION 3. This act becomes effective July 1, 2025.
*S565-v-1*